Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,169
Limitations on use of membership list.

Without consent of the board, a membership list or any part thereof may not be obtained or used by any person for any purpose unrelated to a member's interest as a member. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, without the consent of the board a membership list or any part thereof may not be:

(1) Used to solicit money or property unless such money or property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the members in an election to be held by the corporation;

(2) Used for any commercial purpose; or

(3) Sold to or purchased by any person.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 169.